District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.69

Denial of assistance for fraudulent misrepresentation of residency.

(a)

A person who has been convicted in a federal, District of Columbia, or state court of making a fraudulent statement or representation with respect to that person’s place of residence in order to receive assistance simultaneously from 2 or more states under programs that are funded under title I of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, approved August 22, 1996 (110 Stat. 2105; 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.), title XIX of the Social Security Act, approved July 30, 1965 (79 Stat. 343; 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.), or the Food Stamp Act of 1977, approved September 29, 1977 (91 Stat. 958; 7 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq.), or to receive benefits in 2 or more states under the Supplemental Security Income program under title XVI of the Social Security Act, approved October 30, 1972 (86 Stat. 1465; 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq.), shall be ineligible for TANF benefits for 10 years from the date of the conviction.

(b)

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply with respect to conduct of an individual for any month beginning after the President of the United States grants a pardon with respect to the conduct that was the subject of the conviction.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 569
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 4(g), 46 DCR 905

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-205.69.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 4(e) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 4(e) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 4(h) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of §§ 4-205.69 and 4-205.70, see § 4(e) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), § 4(e) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181), and § 4(e) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary addition of §§ 4-205.69 through 4-205.82, see § 4(h) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 4(h) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 4(h) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 4(h) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).